morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
! this takes care of words like 'on-lar-ca'
! TODO: restrict this. There is no 'onbir-ler-ce'
LEXICON Num_PluCA 
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB      MD_CA;

LEXICON NumOrd
%<ord%>:^(I)nc^I@MB    NumOrdCont;

LEXICON NumOrdCont
            ENDLEX;
            AdjCont;

LEXICON NumDist
%<dist%>:^(ş)^Ar@MB       NumDistCont;

LEXICON NumDistCont
            D_lI;
            ENDLEX;



!
! Verbal morphology starts here
!


! this is for regular verbs: 
!  - aorist form is -(I)r
!  - causative is predictable from the final phoneme
!  - no reflexive or reciprocal is allowed

LEXICON V
%<V%>:@RB   VCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCont;


LEXICON VPartLast
%<V%:partial%>:@RB   VCont;

LEXICON VPart
%<V%:partial%>:@RB   ENDLEX;

LEXICON   VCont
                Vderiv;
                Vinfl;
                AbilPartial;

LEXICON   Vinfl
                    VCausRegular;
                    VCausRegularCont;

LEXICON VNoCausCont
                    Vderiv;
                    VPassive;
                    VPassiveCont;
                    AbilPartial;
        
LEXICON VNoAorCont
                    VCausRegular;
                    VNoCausNoAorCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VNoCausNoAorCont
                    Vderiv;
                    VPassive;
                    VCabilNeg;
                    VNegative;
                    VComp;
                    NonFiniteVerbNoAor;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rcp
%<V%>:@RB   VRcpCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCont;


LEXICON   VRcpCont
                    VCont;
                    VRcp;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VRcp
%<rcp%>:^(I)ş@MB     VCont;


LEXICON V_Rfl
%<V%>:@RB   VRflCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflCont;


LEXICON   VRflCont
                    VCont;
                    VRfl;
                    AbilPartial;
LEXICON   VRfl
%<rfl%>:^(I)n@MB       VCont;

LEXICON  V_Rfl_Rcp
%<V%>:@RB   VRflRcpCont;
%<V%>:@RB   VRflRcpCont;

LEXICON  VRflRcpCont
                    VCont;
                    VRcp;
                    VRfl;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausDir
%<V%>:@RB           VCausDirCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausDirCont;


LEXICON VCausDirCont
                    VCausDir;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausDir
%<caus%>:^D^Ir@MB      VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausIr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausIrCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausIrCont;


LEXICON VCausIrCont
                    VCausIr;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausIr
%<caus%>:^Ir@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausIt
%<V%>:@RB           VCausItCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausItCont;


LEXICON VCausItCont
                    VCausIt;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausIt
%<caus%>:^It@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_Rcp_CausDir
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpCausDirCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCausDirCont;


LEXICON VRcpCausDirCont
                    VRcp;
                    VCausDir;
                    VNoCausCont;
                    AbilPartial;

!LEXICON V_Rfl_CausDir
!%<V%>:@RB           VRflCausDirCont;

!LEXICON           VRflCausDirCont
!                    VRfl;
!                    VCausDir;
!                    VNoCausCont;

!LEXICON V_Rfl_Rcp_CausDir
!                    VRcp;
!                    VRfl;
!                    VCausDir;
!                    VNoCausCont;

LEXICON V_CausIrreg
%<V%>:@RB           VCausIrregCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausIrregCont;


LEXICON VCausIrregCont
                  VNoCausCont;
                  AbilPartial;

! LEXICON V_Rcp_CausIrreg
!                 VNoCausCont;
!                 VRcpCont;

! LEXICON V_Rfl_CausIrreg
!                 VNoCausCont;
!                 VRflCont;

LEXICON V_Rfl_Rcp_CausIrreg
%<V%>:@RB           VRflRcpCausIrregCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflRcpCausIrregCont;


LEXICON VRflRcpCausIrregCont
                 VRfl;
                 VRcp;
                 VNoCausCont;
                 AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VAorArCont;


LEXICON VAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON  VAorAr
%<aor%>:^(A)r@MB   AorArCont;

LEXICON   AorArCont
                    TAMg1Cont;
                    CVcesinePagr;
                    VerbalAdj;
                    AbilPartial;
!                    DerivNCont;
!                    DerivJCont;

LEXICON V_Rcp_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpAorArCont;


LEXICON  VRcpAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VRcp;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rfl_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRflAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflAorArCont;



LEXICON  VRflAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VRfl;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON  V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRflRcpAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRflRcpAorArCont;



LEXICON  VRflRcpAorArCont
            VAorAr;
            VRfl;
            VRcp;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausDir_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausDirAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausDirAorArCont;


LEXICON VCausDirAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausDir;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausIr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausIrAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausIrAorArCont;


LEXICON VCausIrAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausIr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_CausAt_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausAtAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausAtAorArCont;


LEXICON VCausAtAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausAt;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausAt
%<caus%>:^At@MB        VCont;

LEXICON V_Rcp_CausAr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpCausArAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCausArAorArCont;


LEXICON VRcpCausArAorArCont
                        VRcp;
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausAr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON V_Rcp_CausIr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB                   VRcpAorArCausIrCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    VRcpAorArCausIrCont;


LEXICON VRcpAorArCausIrCont
            VAorAr;
            VRcp;
            VCausIr;
            VNoCausNoAorCont;
            VNoAorCont;
            AbilPartial;

!
LEXICON V_CausAr_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausArAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausArAorArCont;



LEXICON VCausArAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausAr;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausAr
%<caus%>:^Ar@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausArt_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausArtAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausArtAorArCont;


LEXICON VCausArtAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausArt;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON VCausArt
%<caus%>:^Art@MB        VCont;

!
LEXICON V_CausIt_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VCausItAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VCausItAorArCont;


LEXICON VCausItAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausIt;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

!
LEXICON V_Rcp_CausDir_AorAr
%<V%>:@RB           VRcpCausDirAorArCont;

%<V%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB   VRcpCausDirAorArCont;


LEXICON VRcpCausDirAorArCont
                        VAorAr;
                        VCausDir;
                        VRcp;
                        VNoCausNoAorCont;
                        AbilPartial;

LEXICON Root
ak           V_CausIt_AorAr;
ara          V_Rfl_Rcp;
asıl         V_CausDir; ! as<psv> but lexicalized
aslol        V_CausIrreg;
aş           V_CausIr_AorAr;
ayı@DEL@r    V_Rcp;
bağı@DEL@r   V_Rcp;
bağır        V_Rcp;
bakakal      V_CausDir;
bak          V_Rcp_AorAr;
bandır       V;
ban          V_AorAr;
bat          V_CausIr_AorAr;
besle        V_Rfl;
bit          V_CausIr_AorAr;
boğ          V_Rcp_AorAr;
boz          V_Rcp_AorAr; ! reciprocal is questionalble bozuşmak is derived but lexically different
bul          V_Rcp_CausDir;
burk         V_CausIt_AorAr;
çağı@DEL@r   V_Rcp;
çağır        V_Rcp;
çakıl        V_CausIrreg; ! cak<psv>?
çak          V_Rcp_AorAr;
çalkan       V;
çarp         V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr;
cay          V_AorAr;
çel          V_CausDir_AorAr;
çık          V_CausAr_AorAr;
çök          V_CausArt_AorAr;
dağıl        V_CausIrreg;
değ          V_AorAr;
del          V_CausDir_AorAr;
depreş       V;
de           V_CausDir;
devral       V_CausIrreg;
dil          V_CausDir_AorAr;
doğ          V_CausIr_AorAr;
dol          V_Rcp_CausDir_AorAr;
döv:döğ      V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr;   ! common usage
döv          V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr;
düş          V_CausIr_AorAr;
ek           V_AorAr;
elver        V_CausDir;
er           V_CausDir_AorAr;
esindir      V;
fısılda      V_Rcp;
geç          V_CausIr_AorAr;
gel          V_CausIrreg; ! causative is `getir'.
gev          V_AorAr; ! dialectal use
gez          V_Rfl_AorAr; !?? reflexive: gezin??
gi^t         V_CausAr_AorAr;
giy          V_Rfl_AorAr;
gör          V_Rfl_Rcp_CausIrreg; ! causative is `göster'.
gül          V_Rcp_CausDir_AorAr;
hallol       V_CausIrreg;
harca        V;
hesabe^t     V_AorAr;
hor% gör     V_Rfl_Rcp_CausIrreg;
iç           V_CausIr_AorAr;
ileri% sür   V_CausDir_AorAr;
it           V_Rcp_AorAr;
kaç          V_Rcp_CausIr_AorAr;
kal          V_CausDir;
kapa         V_Rfl;
kapıl        V_CausIrreg;
karmaş       V;
karşıla      V_Rcp;
kaşı         V_Rfl;
kaste^t      V_AorAr;
kıl          V_CausDir_AorAr;
kıpra        V_Rfl_Rcp;     ! Rcp ??
kız          V_AorAr;
kok          V_CausIt_AorAr;
kop          V_Rcp_CausAr_AorAr;
kork         V_CausIt_AorAr;
küre         V;
kurtul       V_CausIrreg;
kurula       V_Rfl;
kur          V_CausDir_AorAr;
mecbur% kal  V_CausDir;
mevzubahis% ol  V_CausIrreg; ! old
motive% e^t   V_AorAr;
oaralı% ol   V_CausDir;
öp           V_Rcp_AorAr;
örnek% al    V_CausDir;
ört          V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr;
öt           V_Rcp_AorAr;
oyna         V_Rcp;
özle         V_Rcp;
piş          V_CausIr_AorAr;
rastgel      V_CausDir;
saç          V_AorAr;
şakı         V;
sal          V_CausDir_AorAr;
sark         V_CausIt_AorAr;
satınal      V_CausDir;
sev          V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr;   ! reflexive ??
sık          V_Rcp_AorAr;
şiş          V_CausIr_AorAr;
şoke% ol     V_CausIrreg;
sokul        V_CausDir; !caus irreg??
sol          V_CausDir_AorAr;
somur        V;
söv          V_Rcp_AorAr;
söyle        V_Rfl_Rcp;
sürgün% e^t  V_AorAr;
sürt         V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr;
tak          V_Rfl_Rcp_AorAr; ! reciprocal is questionable
tanı         V_Rcp;
tara         V_Rfl;
terk% e^t    V_CausDir_AorAr;
tık          V_CausAt_AorAr;
tırs         V_CausIt_AorAr;
toz          V_CausIt_AorAr;
tut          V_Rcp_AorAr;
uç           V_CausIr_AorAr;
ulaş         V;
ürk          V_CausIt_AorAr;
üş           V_CausAr_AorAr; !dialectal
uy           V_Rcp_AorAr;
var          V_CausDir;
yar          V_CausDir_AorAr;
yat          V_CausIr_AorAr;
yaz          V_Rcp_AorAr;
yen          V_AorAr;
yerine% getir V;
yer% ver     V_CausDir;
yıka         V_Rfl;
yıl          V_CausDir_AorAr;
yit          V_CausIr_AorAr;
yok% ol      V_CausIrreg;
zorunda% kal V_CausIrreg; ! Caus: zorunda bırak
anla         V_Rcp;
bula         V;
ırala        V;
tırtıkla     V;
yala         V_Rfl_Rcp;
dona         V_Rfl;
gözardı     VPart;       !in 'gözardı et-'
püslen      VPartLast;   !in 'süslen püslen' this is difficult to catch: both parts are likely inflected 
tolere      VPart;       !in 'tolere et-'
vaz         VPart;      !in "vazgeç-", common typo
